Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety
Closure of Bars and Social Clubs.
Premises operating under a license, other than a 2d Class license, issued by the Department of Liquor and Lottery, Division of Liquor Control, shall suspend or modify operations as follows:

i.
All “Clubs” as defined by

7 V.S.A. § 2(7)
shall suspend on-premises operations.

ii.
1st Class licensees who hold a Restaurant License issued by VDH for an on-site kitchen equipped to provide menu service must accompany all beverage alcohol orders with food; serve only those patrons who are seated;
and continue to abide by existing health and safety guidance issued by ACCD.

iii.
All other 1st Class licensees, including Clubs, shall suspend operations.

iv.
All 4th Class licensees shall suspend operations.

v.
All premises suspending or modifying operations hereunder may offer or continue to offer take-out, curbside pickup and delivery of beverage alcohol, including spirit-based drinks and malt and vinous product.

d.

Contact Log.
All restaurants and other public accommodations which host organized non-essential activities shall maintain an easily accessible, legible log of all employees, customers, members and guests and their contact
information, including name, address, phone number and email address for 30 days in the event contact tracing is required by VDH. For the sake of clarity, this requirement applies to all employees and all guests in every party.

e.

Consent to Contact.
All customers, members and guests providing information in accordance with section 2(d) above, consent to be contacted by the VDH Contact Tracing Team.

f.

Contact Tracing Compliance.
To preserve the public health and safety, to ensure the health and safety of the State, and to prevent the spread of COVID-19, Vermonters are directed to comply with requests made by the VDH Contact Tracing
Team. Vermonters who have been identified as a case or a close contact are required to:

i.
Promptly answer calls or otherwise respond to the VDH Contact Tracing Team;

ii.
Provide full, complete and truthful information concerning places they have been, activities they have engaged in and persons with whom the individual has had close contact, including contact information when possible;

iii.
Comply with all VDH recommended quarantine and isolation periods and testing.

g.

Recreational Sports.
All recreational sports programs, including organized and/or informal recreational youth and adult league sports, practices, games and tournaments, are hereby suspended. This suspension shall not apply to school-sponsored
sports activities which are subject to applicable Agency of Education Guidance.

h.

Returning College Students.
All students who are returning home from a college or university, in-state or out of state, shall quarantine at home for fourteen days, with a test for COVID-19 strongly encouraged, or quarantine for no less
than seven (7) days at which time they must be tested for COVID-19.

i.

Telework.
All businesses, not-for-profit entities and municipal government entities in the State shall reinstitute, to the maximum extent possible, or reemphasize to the extent necessary, telecommuting or work from home
procedures. In person meetings are strongly discouraged and all meetings should be held by telephone or electronically to avoid in person meetings whenever possible.

Effective Saturday, November 14, 2020 at 10:00 p.m.:

Failure to comply with this provision may result in referral to the Office of the Attorney General for enforcement.

This Addendum 8 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect as of Friday, November 13, 2020 and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on December 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont
Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the Executive Order.

Dated November 20, 2020

ADDENDUM 9 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to first monitor and plan for outbreaks of a
respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”), and then to implement measures to keep Vermonters healthy and safe; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in accordance
with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response and mitigation efforts and share information with local and State officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and as of December 14, 2020, the State has experienced 5,857 cases and 96 deaths which are COVID-19 related; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, DPS and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning
through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring
Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and would
be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor undertook a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most vulnerable, while reopening
our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, despite months of success, statewide there was an acceleration in COVID-19 transmission in November 2020; and

WHEREAS, Vermonters must come together as we have before in this crisis, to do our part to protect the very ill and elderly, ensure those who experience the most severe symptoms have access to the care they need, and keep our schools and economy open,
by preventing and slowing the spread of this virus; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Friday, January 15, 2021.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Friday, January 15, 2021.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

Except as modified herein, the Amended and Restated Executive Order issued June 5, 2020, and all Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on January 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation
with VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

This Addendum 9 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on January 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the Executive Order.

Dated December 15, 2020

ADDENDUM 10 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to first monitor and plan for outbreaks of a
respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”) and then to implement measures to keep Vermonters healthy and safe; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in accordance
with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response and mitigation efforts and share information with local and State officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and as of January 14, 2021, the State has experienced 9,573 cases (an increase of over 3,700 cases in a one-month period), and 164 deaths (68 additional
deaths in a one-month period) which are COVID-19 related; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, DPS and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning
through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring
Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and would
be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor undertook a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most vulnerable, while reopening
our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, despite months of success over the summer and into the fall of 2020 for Vermont, statewide, in the Northeast and across the nation there has been an acceleration in COVID-19 cases, leading to more hospitalization and fatalities; and

WHEREAS, Vermonters must come together as we have before in this crisis, to do our part to protect the very ill and elderly, ensure those who experience the most severe symptoms have access to the care they need, and keep our schools and economy open,
by preventing and slowing the spread of this virus; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Monday, February 15, 2021.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Monday, February 15, 2021.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

Except as modified herein, the Amended and Restated Executive Order issued June 5, 2020, and all Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on February 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation
with VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

This Addendum 10 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on February 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the Executive Order.

Dated January 15, 2021

ADDENDUM 11 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to first monitor and plan for outbreaks of a
respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”) and then to implement measures to keep Vermonters healthy and safe; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in accordance
with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response and mitigation efforts and share information with local and State officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and as of February 14, 2021, the State has experienced 13,862 cases (an increase of over 4,200 cases in a one-month period), and 190 deaths (26 additional
deaths in a one-month period) which are COVID-19 related; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, DPS and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning
through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring
Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and would
be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor undertook a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most vulnerable, while reopening
our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, while the Governor is optimistic that the COVID-19 vaccine in Vermont will eventually bring much needed relief, the roll-out of the vaccine will be a methodical, deliberate process designed to protect the Vermonters most vulnerable to severe
illness or death from COVID; and

WHEREAS, numerous tools needed to address response efforts remain in place by virtue of the State of Emergency declaration, including protections for residents of long term and other medical care facilities, National Guard resources standing by to assist
with the COVID-19 response, workplace health and safety requirements, public gathering limitations, a mandate for facial coverings, expanded housing and meal delivery systems, expanded eligibility for unemployment insurance,
tools needed by certain businesses to maintain a minimum level of economic sustainability, moratoria on evictions and utility service disconnection, and federal emergency funding; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Monday, March 15, 2021.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Monday, March 15, 2021.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

Except as modified herein, the Executive Order, as Amended and Restated June 5, 2020, and all Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on March 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation
with VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

This Addendum 11 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on March 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the Executive Order.

Dated February 15, 2021

ADDENDUM 12 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to first monitor and plan for outbreaks of a
respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”) and then to implement measures to keep Vermonters healthy and safe; and

WHEREAS, the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services (HHS) declared a public health emergency on January 31, 2020, which was renewed effective January 21, 2021 for 90 days and, as advised in a letter to the Governor dated January 22, 2021
from the Acting Secretary of HHS, will likely remain in place for the entirety of 2021; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in accordance
with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response, mitigation and, most recently, vaccination efforts and share information with local and State officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and as of March 14, 2021, the State has experienced 16,890 cases, and tragically surpassed 200 deaths which are COVID-19 related; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on February 24, 2021, President Biden provided notice to the United States Congress that the national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic, originally issued by former President Trump on March 13, 2020, will continue in effect beyond
March 1, 2021; and

WHEREAS, following the issuance of the Executive Order, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, DPS and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety
in the COVID-19 health emergency including issuing the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings,
closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact
businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public
health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken at that time, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would have had a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and threatened
to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, beginning in April 2020, the Governor undertook a cautious, measured and data- based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most
vulnerable, while reopening our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, the mitigation measures taken in 2020, including mandatory mask-wearing among other mandatory health and safety protocols, substantial federal financial aid, food distribution and emergency housing, prepared Vermonters, our healthcare institutions
and our schools for the spike in COVID-19 cases in late fall and early winter to such an extent Vermont was able to avoid a substantial roll-back of Vermont’s economic restart efforts; and

WHEREAS, the COVID-19 vaccine in Vermont is bringing much needed relief and, together with federal efforts, the Governor is proceeding to roll out vaccine delivery in a methodical, deliberate process designed to protect the Vermonters most vulnerable
to severe illness or death from COVID, as well as return our children to school full-time as quickly as possible; and

WHEREAS, numerous tools needed to address response efforts remain in place by virtue of the State of Emergency declaration, including robust vaccine implementation, protections for residents of long term and other medical care facilities, National Guard
resources standing by to assist with the COVID-19 response, workplace health and safety requirements, public gathering limitations, a mandate for facial coverings, expanded housing and meal delivery systems, expanded eligibility
for unemployment insurance, tools needed by certain businesses to maintain a minimum level of economic sustainability, enhanced protections to prevent evictions and utility service disconnection and access to federal emergency
funding; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined to ease restrictions on access to a junior operator’s license by Vermont’s young drivers who were unable to obtain a learner’s permit during the period of March through June 2020, while maintaining roadway safety for
the public; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Thursday, April 15, 2021.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Thursday, April 15, 2021.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.
Except as modified herein, the Executive Order, as Amended and Restated June 5, 2020, and all Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on April 15, 2021,
at which time the Governor, in consultation with VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

2.

Junior Operator’s Licenses.
Effective March 13, 2021, the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles is hereby directed to issue a junior operator’s license to any individual who was eligible but unable to obtain a learner’s permit
from March 13, 2020 through June 30, 2020 due to the COVID-19 emergency, but otherwise complies with the requirements of

23 V.S.A. § 607
. For the sake of clarity, an individual must have held a learner’s permit for at least 8 consecutive months between the period March 13, 2020-March 13, 2021 before being issued a junior operator’s license in
accordance with this provision.

This Addendum 12 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on April 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the Executive Order.

Dated March 15, 2021

ADDENDUM 13 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extended Expansion of Unemployment Benefits and Employer Contribution Relief]

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency (“Executive Order”), as amended and restated June 15, 2020 (“Amended and Restated Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the
State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health (VDH), Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management (DPS), the Vermont Agency of Human Services (AHS) and the Agency of Education (AoE), initiated aggressive
and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended, to, among other things, direct the
Commissioner of the Department of Labor to extend unemployment insurance to those Vermonters following the instructions of their health care providers to self-isolate or quarantine; to remove the work search requirement for
those workers affected by temporary closure of a business; to temporarily suspend any mechanisms that would delay the release of funds to claimants; and to relieve employers of charges for benefits paid to an individual for
reasons related to COVID-19 for the duration of the Emergency Declaration; and

WHEREAS, in 2020 the COVID-19 pandemic rendered thousands of Vermonters jobless through no fault of their own, when they were laid off because their employers were forced to close their doors or severely restrict the services they could offer to the public;
and

WHEREAS, other Vermonters were forced to leave employment to care for children or family members who could no longer attend school, day care, or other services or who were ill or under quarantine; and

WHEREAS, many Vermont employers lost significant income or revenue because they were limited in their capacity to serve the general public or open their doors in an effort to slow the spread of COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in 2020 Acts and Resolves No. 91 (the “Act”), Section 30, the General Assembly reiterated the Governor’s policies of ensuring unemployment insurance for those Vermonters who temporarily or permanently lost their jobs due to COVID-19, and relief
for employers from charges for benefits paid to an individual for circumstances related to COVID-19, however the Act did not fully contemplate the duration of the pandemic or the severity of its economic consequences; and

WHEREAS, the Act’s COVID-19 emergency provisions expire March 31, 2021; and

WHEREAS, the Act conferred on the Commissioner of Labor the authority to extend benefit charge relief to employers as appropriate in light of the terms of any emergency order issued by the Governor and any other relevant conditions or factors.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11,

21 V.S.A. § 1325(a)(3)
(C) and other laws, do hereby order and direct the Commissioner of Labor to extend unemployment benefits and benefit charge relief as follows:

Effective March 31, 2021, the emergency provisions of

21 V.S.A. §§ 1325(a)(1)(G)
, (H) and

21 V.S.A. § 1325(a)(3)
, shall be extended to provide unemployment benefit charge relief to employers for employees who separate from employment for a COVID-19 qualifying reason, as appropriate in light of the terms of this
Order and any other relevant conditions or factors.

Effective March 31, 2021, the emergency provisions of

21 V.S.A. § 1344(a)(2)(A)
, shall be extended to provide unemployment benefits to individuals who are forced to leave their employment for a COVID-19 qualifying reason.

This Addendum 13 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on April 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the Executive Order.

Dated April 1, 2021

ADDENDUM 14 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to first monitor and plan for outbreaks of a
respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”) and then to implement measures to keep Vermonters healthy and safe; and

WHEREAS, the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services (HHS) declared a public health emergency on January 31, 2020, which was renewed effective January 21, 2021 for 90 days and, as advised in a letter to the Governor dated January 22, 2021
from the Acting Secretary of HHS, will likely remain in place for the entirety of 2021; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in accordance
with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response, mitigation and, most recently, vaccination efforts and share information with local and State officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and as of March 14, 2021, the State has experienced 16,890 cases, and tragically surpassed 200 deaths which are COVID-19 related; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on February 24, 2021, President Biden provided notice to the United States Congress that the national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic, originally issued by former President Trump on March 13, 2020, will continue in effect beyond
March 1, 2021; and

WHEREAS, following the issuance of the Executive Order, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, DPS and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety
in the COVID-19 health emergency including issuing the Executive Order, as supplemented and amended and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order, to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings,
closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close
contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring Vermonters to stay home and stay safe, with exceptions for essential purposes, and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed
critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken at that time, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would have had a much more devastating effect on Vermonters and threatened
to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, beginning in April 2020, the Governor undertook a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities in order to protect the most
vulnerable, while reopening our business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, the mitigation measures taken in 2020, including mandatory mask-wearing among other mandatory health and safety protocols, substantial federal financial aid, food distribution and emergency housing, prepared Vermonters, our healthcare institutions
and our schools for the spike in COVID-19 cases in late fall and early winter to such an extent Vermont was able to avoid a substantial roll-back of Vermont’s economic restart efforts; and

WHEREAS, the COVID-19 vaccine in Vermont is bringing much needed relief and, together with federal efforts, the Governor is proceeding to roll out vaccine delivery in a methodical, deliberate process designed to protect the Vermonters most vulnerable
to severe illness or death from COVID, as well as return our children to school full-time as quickly as possible; and

WHEREAS, numerous tools needed to address response efforts remain in place by virtue of the State of Emergency declaration, including robust vaccine implementation, protections for residents of long term and other medical care facilities, National Guard
resources standing by to assist with the COVID-19 response, workplace health and safety requirements, public gathering limitations, a mandate for facial coverings, expanded housing and meal delivery systems and associated
federal emergency funding, expanded eligibility for unemployment insurance, tools needed by certain businesses to maintain a minimum level of economic sustainability and enhanced protections to prevent evictions and
utility service disconnection; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Saturday, May 15, 2021.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Saturday, May 15, 2021.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.
Except as modified herein, the Executive Order, as Amended and Restated June 5, 2020, and all Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15,
2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation with VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and associated recovery measures and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

This Addendum 14 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and associated recovery measures and determine whether to amend or extend the Executive Order.
